Nevada, session 83, SB367.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Rural and Community Media Program is
hereby established within the Department to assist a department or
agency of this State with public outreach, public engagement,
marketing and advertising to members of rural communities and
historically underrepresented communities through the use of
rural and community media.
2. The Director shall administer the Program. In
administering the Program, the Director shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a database of rural and community
media outlets in this State.
(b) Conduct training, education and outreach to the
departments and agencies of this State to inform them of the
importance of rural and community media to members of rural
communities and historically underrepresented communities and
the benefits of inclusive and equitable strategies to increase public
engagement in State government.
(c) Advise the departments and agencies of this State on
strategies to better tailor public outreach, public engagement,
marketing and advertising to rural communities and historically
underrepresented communities.
(d) Cultivate relationships with rural and community media
outlets.
-
*SB367*

– 3 –
3. On or before January 1 of each year, the Director of the
Department shall submit a report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature, a copy of which
must be posted on the official Internet website of this State, that
sets forth for the immediately preceding 12 months:
(a) A list of each department or agency of the State, if any, that
utilized a rural or community media outlet for marketing and
advertising.
(b) The amount paid by each department or agency of this
State, if any, to a rural or community media outlet pursuant to a
contract or subcontract for marketing and advertising.
(c) A list of each rural or community media outlet, if any, that
received from a department or agency of this State a contract or
subcontract to place marketing or advertising material.
(d) A list of the languages in which marketing and advertising
materials were provided by a rural or community media outlet with
a contract or subcontract with a department or agency of this
State.
(e) An analysis of the challenges the Program has faced, if
any, the efforts to address those challenges and recommendations
to improve the Program.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Rural or community media” means any nonprofit
organization or small business that produces community news and
cultural content of specific interest to a community, including a
historically underrepresented community, a neighborhood or a
region in this State.
(b) “Rural or community media outlet” means an entity in
which at least one-half of the content is originally produced
community news and cultural content of specific interest to a
community, including a historically underrepresented community,
a neighborhood or a region in this State through broadcast, print
or digital means, including, without limitation, television, radio or
online outlets on a daily, weekly or other regular interval and that
has continually produced such content for at least 1 year.
Sec. 3. 1. A department or agency of this State that expends
money on public outreach, marketing or advertising shall, to the
greatest extent possible, direct expenditures to rural or community
media outlets to improve outreach to and engagement with
members of the communities served by those outlets.
2. On or before October 1 of each year, each department or
agency of this State that expends money pursuant to subsection 1
shall provide to the Director a report that sets forth for the
immediately preceding 12 months:
-
*SB367*

– 4 –
(a) Each rural or community media outlet the department or
agency utilized, if any, for marketing or advertising, whether a
contract or subcontract was entered into with the media outlet
and, if so, the amount paid pursuant to such a contract or
subcontract.
(b) A list of all the languages in which marketing and
advertising materials were provided by a rural or community
media outlet with a contract or subcontract with the department or
agency.
3. As used in this section, “rural or community media outlet”
has the meaning ascribed to it in section 2 of this act.
Sec. 4. NRS 232.212 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.212 As used in NRS 232.212 to 232.2198, inclusive, and
sections 2 and 3 of this act, unless the context requires otherwise:
1. “Department” means the Department of Administration.
2. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
3. “Public body” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241.015.
Sec. 5. 1. The first report that a department or agency of this
State is required to prepare and submit pursuant to section 3 of this
act must be submitted on or before October 1, 2026.
2. The first report that the Director of the Department of
Administration is required to prepare and submit to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau pursuant to section 2 of this act must
be submitted on or before January 1, 2027.
Sec. 6. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
H
-
*SB367*